Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-275.04
Recitals; intent.

When any instrument affecting title to real property is required by law to be recorded in any public record in order to be valid or effective or perfected either against all persons or against any person or persons or class of persons, and when any notice or statement concerning any instrument affecting title to real property is required by law so to be recorded in order for such instrument to be so valid or effective or perfected, no reference or recital as to such instrument contained in any other recorded instrument shall be notice of it to any person not an immediate party to the instrument making the reference, or put any such person upon inquiry concerning it, unless (1) the instrument referred to, or the notice or statement thereof in the form so required by law, has been recorded as so required prior to the recording of the reference or recital, and either the reference or recital specifies the public records and place therein where the instrument, notice or statement is to be found, or the instrument, notice or statement is in the chain of record title to the real property affected within a period of twenty years prior to the recording of the reference or recital, or (2) if the reference or recital has been made before September 28, 1959, unless the instrument, statement or notice is recorded as required by law not later than one year thereafter.

Laws 1959, c. 348, § 1, p. 1234.